Illinois, session 104th, SB2255.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Surveillance-Based Price and Wage Discrimination Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act: 7    "Automated decision system" means any system, software, or 8process, including one derived from machine learning, 9statistics, or other data processing or artificial 10intelligence techniques and excluding passive computing 11infrastructure, that uses computation, the result of which is 12used to assist or replace human decision-making. 13    "Behaviors" mean an individual's observable, measurable, 14or inferred actions, habits, preferences, interests, or 15vulnerabilities, including an individual's political, 16personal, or professional affiliations, web browsing history, 17purchase history, financial circumstances, or consumer 18behaviors. 19    "Biometric information" means data or information 20generated by the technological, processing, measurement, or 21analysis of a consumer's or employee's biological, physical, 22or behavioral characteristics, that can be used for the 23purpose of uniquely identifying an individual. "Biometric   SB2255- 2 -LRB104 08574 SPS 18626 b1information" includes fingerprints, voiceprints, scans or 2records of an eye retina or iris, facial maps, facial 3geometry, facial templates, genetic information, or other 4unique biological, physical, or behavioral patterns or 5characteristics. 6    "Consumer" has the meaning set forth in the Consumer Fraud 7and Deceptive Business Practices Act. 8    "Employee" has the meaning set forth in the Illinois Wage 9Payment and Collection Act. 10    "Genetic information" has the meaning set forth in the 11Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, 12as specified in 45 CFR 160.103. 13    "Individualized" means specific to an individual or group, 14band, class, or tier of individuals with particular personal 15characteristics, behaviors, or biometric information. 16    "Insurer" means every person engaged as principal, 17indemnitor, surety, or contractor in the business of making 18insurance contracts. 19    "Personal characteristics" means individual qualities, 20features, attributes, or traits, including immutable 21characteristics, such as race and eye color, mutable 22characteristics, such as address, weight, citizenship, or 23parenthood status, and any other personally identifiable 24information that could be used to identify an individual, 25including social security number, name, or phone number. 26    "Price" means the amount charged to a consumer in relation   SB2255- 3 -LRB104 08574 SPS 18626 b1to a transaction, including all related costs and fees, and 2any other material terms of the transaction that has a direct 3bearing on the amount paid by the consumer or the value of the 4good or service to the consumer. 5    "Surveillance data" means data obtained through 6observation, inference, or surveillance of a consumer or 7employee that is related to personal characteristics, 8behaviors, or biometric information of the individual or 9group, band, class, or tier of individuals of which the 10individual is a part. "Surveillance data" includes information 11gathered, purchased, or otherwise acquired. 12    "Wage" has the meaning set forth in the Illinois Wage 13Payment and Collection Act. 14    Section 10. Prohibit surveillance-based price 15discrimination. 16    (a) A person shall not use surveillance data as part of an 17automated decision system to inform the individualized price 18assessed to a consumer for goods or services. A person does not 19violate this subsection if the person assesses different 20prices to different consumers based on the cost of providing 21the good or service to the different consumers.22    (b) This Section shall not apply to: 23        (1) an insurer in compliance with the Illinois 24    Insurance Code that only uses risk-relevant data as part 25    of an automated decision system that informs decisions   SB2255- 4 -LRB104 08574 SPS 18626 b1    related to any costs assessed to a consumer for an 2    insurance policy; or3        (2) an entity that declines to extend credit at 4    specific terms to a consumer or enter into a transaction 5    with a consumer based on data provided in a consumer 6    report in compliance with the Fair Credit Reporting Act. 7    Section 15. Prohibit surveillance-based wage 8discrimination. 9    (a) A person shall not use surveillance data as part of an 10automated decision system to inform the individualized wage 11paid to an employee. A person does not violate this subsection 12if the person: 13        (1) offered individualized wages based solely on: 14            (A) data specific to the individual employee that 15        is directly related to the tasks the employee was 16        hired to perform; or 17            (B) differences in the cost to the employee of 18        providing labor to the person; 19        (2) discloses in plain language before hiring an 20    employee whose wages are set in whole or in part through 21    automated decision-making what data is considered and how 22    automated decision-making considers that data; and 23        (3) developed and proactively provided to employees 24    reasonable procedures to ensure the accuracy of all data 25    considered by an automated decision-making system in   SB2255- 5 -LRB104 08574 SPS 18626 b1    setting wage rates, as determined by rule. 2    (b) This Section shall not apply to a person who makes a 3decision not to hire an employee that the person has not 4previously employed. 5    Section 20. Enforcement. The Attorney General shall 6enforce this Act. A person who violates this Act shall be 7subject to a civil penalty not to exceed $10,000 for each 8violation and reasonable attorney's fees. A violation of any 9provision of this Act shall constitute a separate violation 10with respect to each consumer, employee, or transaction. 11    Section 25. Private right of action. 12    (a) A person aggrieved by a violation of this Act may bring 13a civil action on behalf of themselves or a group of similarly 14situated persons to restrain further violations and to recover 15damages, costs, and reasonable attorney's fees, including the 16greater of: 17        (1) the amount of actual damages sustained; 18        (2) $3,000 for each violation; or 19        (3) 3 times the amount of actual damages sustained, if 20    it is established by clear and convincing evidence that 21    the person who violated this Act engaged in bad faith 22    conduct or intentionally violated this Act. 23    (b) A violation of any provision of this Act shall 24constitute a separate violation with respect to each consumer,   SB2255- 6 -LRB104 08574 SPS 18626 b1employee, or transaction. 2    Section 30. Relationship with other laws. Nothing in this 3Act, including the enforcement authority granted to the 4Attorney General, preempts or otherwise affects any other 5right, claim, remedy, presumption, or defense available at law 6or in equity.  7    Section 35. Rulemaking. The Attorney General may adopt 8rules necessary to implement and enforce this Act.